Hawaii statutes.
§326-4 Officers and employees; sickness and
accident; expense. In case any officer or employee of the department of
health becomes ill or is injured at the facility at Kalaupapa and, in the
opinion of the physician of the facility, or in the absence of the physician an
authorized agent of the department of health, suitable medical, hospital,
nursing, or other services or facilities are not available there, the
department shall incur and pay the reasonable and necessary expenses of
removing and transporting the officer or employee to and from a place within
the State where suitable hospital facilities or treatment can be secured. [L
1941, c 108, §1; RL 1945, §2405; RL 1955, §50-6; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS
§326-4; am L 1968, c 63, §2; am L 1969, c 105, §1; am L 1985, c 250, §4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next